Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-126.01
Disability, defined.

For purposes of sections 20-126 to 20-131, disability has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. 12102, as such section existed on January 1, 2021.

Laws 1997, LB 254, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB806, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 4.